Maryland, session 2025, SB0151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
Subtitle 5. Consideration of Criminal History OR DISCIPLINARY RECORD in the
Admissions Process.
26–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0151*

SENATE BILL 151
(b) “Admissions application” means an individual application to enroll as an
undergraduate student at an institution of higher education.
(c) “Criminal history” means an arrest or a criminal conviction.
(D) “DISCIPLINARY RECORD” MEANS ANY INFORMATION RELATING TO THE
DISCIPLINE OF A STUDENT FROM A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE PRIMARY OR SECONDARY
SCHOOL IN ANY STATE.
(E) “INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
10–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(d)] (F) “Third–party admissions application” means an admissions application
not controlled by the institution.
26–503.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an institution of higher
education may not use an admissions application that contains questions about the
criminal history OR DISCIPLINARY RECORD of the applicant.
(b) An institution of higher education may use a third–party admissions
application that contains questions about the criminal history OR DISCIPLINARY RECORD
of the applicant if the institution:
(1) Does not use the third–party admissions application to disqualify an
applicant based on the applicant’s criminal history OR DISCIPLINARY RECORD; and
(2) Posts a notice on its website stating that a criminal history OR
DISCIPLINARY RECORD does not disqualify an applicant from admission.
26–504.
(a) Subject to § 26–505 of this subtitle, an institution of higher education may
make inquiries into and consider information about a student’s criminal history for the
purpose of:
(1) Making decisions regarding access to campus residency; or
(2) Offering supportive counseling or services to help rehabilitate and
educate the student on barriers a criminal record may present.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, in making inquiries or
considering information under this section, an institution of higher education may not

SENATE BILL 151 3
automatically or unreasonably restrict a student’s access to campus residency based on that
student’s criminal history.
(2) An institution of higher education may develop a process for
determining or restricting access to campus residency for a student who has been convicted
of:
(i) A sexual crime under Title 3, Subtitle 3 of the Criminal Law
Article;
(ii) A crime of violence under Title 14 of the Criminal Law Article; or
(iii) A substantially similar crime in another state.
(C) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION MAY MAKE INQUIRIES INTO
AND CONSIDER INFORMATION ABOUT A STUDENT’S DISCIPLINARY RECORD FOR
DISCIPLINE RELATED TO ACADEMIC DISHONESTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.